District of Columbia statutes.
46-301.03

Remedies cumulative.

(a)

Remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law, including the recognition of a support order of a foreign country or political subdivision on the basis of comity.

(b)

This chapter does not:

(1)

Provide the exclusive method of establishing or enforcing a support order under the law of the District; or

(2)

Grant a tribunal of the District jurisdiction to render judgment or issue an order relating to child custody or visitation in a proceeding under this chapter.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 103, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(a)(2), 53 DCR 3634

Cross References

Court-ordered child support payments, arrearages, interception of District income tax refunds of individuals, see § 47-

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-341.3.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “Remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law.”

Editor's Notes

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 104 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).